Arkansas, session 2025, SB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 14, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-14-125. Unchanged rate of annual ad valorem property tax — Election
requirements.
(a) If in an odd-numbered year the rate of an annual ad valorem
property tax on the assessed value of taxable real, personal, and utility
property levied by a public school district board of directors under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 14, § 3(c), is unchanged from the previous rate of the
annual ad valorem property tax, then, upon request of the public school
district board of directors, the county board of election commissioners of
the county in which the public school district is situated may:
(1) Reduce the number of polling places;
(2) Not open any polling places on election day so that the
*TNL078*
02-19-2025 11:26:42 TNL078

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/11/25 S2/19/25 SB135
election may be conducted only by absentee ballot and early voting; or
(3)(A) Hold the election:
(i) As part of the election declared to be by
candidate only; or
(ii)(a) Through the selection of a qualified elector
designated by the public school district board of directors to cast a ballot
for the previous, unchanged rate of annual ad valorem property tax at a
designated time and location on election day or during the period of time
that would otherwise be designated for early voting.
(b) A public school district board of
directors shall:
(1) Appoint by resolution a qualified
elector of the school district or appoint the county board of election
commissioners to designate a qualified elector of the school district to cast
a ballot for the public school district's unchanged rate of annual ad valorem
property tax; and
(2) Forward a file-marked copy of the
resolution under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(b)(1) of this section to the
county clerk and the county election commission of the county in which the
public school district is situated simultaneously when it submits the rate of
tax as required by § 6-14-111(i).
(c)(1) Upon receipt of a resolution under
subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(b) of this section, a county board of election
commissioners shall notify the public school district board of directors of
the place, date, and time in which the designated qualified elector under
subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(b)(1) of this section shall cast the ballot for the
public school district's unchanged rate of annual ad valorem property tax.
(2) If the designated qualified elector
under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(b)(1) of this section is not present at the
place, on the date, or at the time designated by a county board of election
commissioners under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(c)(1) of this section, then the
county board of election commissioners shall designate a qualified elector of
the school district to cast the ballot for the public school district's
unchanged rate of annual ad valorem property tax and notify the
superintendent and board of directors of the public school district for which
the ballot was cast.
02-19-2025 11:26:42 TNL078

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/11/25 S2/19/25 SB135
(b) For elections held under subdivision (a)(3) of this section:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the county board of election
commissioners of the county in which the public school district is situated
shall not open any polling places on election date if the unchanged rate of
taxation is the only issue to be voted on; and
(2) In conjunction with the preferential primary or general
election, the county board of election commissioners shall place the
unchanged rate of the annual ad valorem property tax on the ballot of all
qualified electors of the school district.

/s/J. Boyd

























02-19-2025 11:26:42 TNL078